Idaho statutes. Title 74 TRANSPARENT AND ETHICAL GOVERNMENT
Chapter 1 PUBLIC RECORDS ACT
§ 74-106. Records exempt from disclosure — Personnel records, personal information, health records, professional discipline.

The following records are exempt from disclosure:

Except as provided in this subsection, all personnel records of a current or former public official other than the public official’s public service or employment history, classification, pay grade and step, longevity, gross salary and salary history, including bonuses, severance packages, other compensation or vouchered and unvouchered expenses for which reimbursement was paid, status, workplace and employing agency. All other personnel information relating to a public employee or applicant including, but not limited to, information regarding sex, race, marital status, birth date, home address and telephone number, social security number, driver’s license number, applications, testing and scoring materials, grievances, correspondence and performance evaluations, shall not be disclosed to the public without the employee’s or applicant’s written consent. Names of applicants to classified or merit system positions shall not be disclosed to the public without the applicant’s written consent. Disclosure of names as part of a background check is permitted. Names of the five (5) final applicants to all other positions shall be available to the public. If such group is less than five (5) finalists, then the entire list of applicants shall be available to the public. A public official or authorized representative may inspect and copy his personnel records, except for material used to screen and test for employment.

Retired employees’ and retired public officials’ home addresses, home telephone numbers and other financial and nonfinancial membership records; active and inactive member financial and membership records and mortgage portfolio loan documents maintained by the public employee retirement system. Financial statements prepared by retirement system staff, funding agents and custodians concerning the investment of assets of the public employee retirement system of Idaho are not considered confidential under this chapter.

Information and records submitted to the Idaho state lottery for the performance of background investigations of employees, lottery retailers and major procurement contractors; audit records of lottery retailers, vendors and major procurement contractors submitted to or performed by the Idaho state lottery; validation and security tests of the state lottery for lottery games; business records and information submitted pursuant to sections 67-7412(8) and (9) and 67-7421(8) and (9), Idaho Code, and such documents and information obtained and held for the purposes of lottery security and investigative action as determined by lottery rules unless the public interest in disclosure substantially outweighs the private need for protection from public disclosure.

Records of a personal nature as follows:

Records of personal debt filed with a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic pursuant to law;

Personal bank records compiled by a public depositor for the purpose of public funds transactions conducted pursuant to law;

Records of ownership of financial obligations and instruments of a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic, such as bonds, compiled by the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic pursuant to law;

Records, with regard to the ownership of, or security interests in, registered public obligations;

Vital statistics records;

Military records as described in and pursuant to section 65-301, Idaho Code;

Social security numbers; and

The following personal data identifiers for an individual may be disclosed only in the following redacted format:

The initials of any minor children of the individual;

Information in an income or other tax return measured by items of income or sales, which is gathered by a public agency for the purpose of administering the tax, except such information to the extent disclosed in a written decision of the tax commission pursuant to a taxpayer protest of a deficiency determination by the tax commission, under the provisions of section 63-3045B, Idaho Code.

Records of a personal nature related directly or indirectly to the application for and provision of statutory services rendered to persons applying for public care for people who are elderly, indigent or have mental or physical disabilities, or participation in an environmental or a public health study, provided the provisions of this subsection making records exempt from disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or information contained in those records are necessary for a background check on an individual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of firearms, guns or ammunition.

Employment security information, except that a person may agree, through written, informed consent, to waive the exemption so that a third party may obtain information pertaining to the person, unless access to the information by the person is restricted by subsection (3)(a), (3)(b) or (3)(d) of section 74-113, Idaho Code. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 74-113, Idaho Code, a person may not review identifying information concerning an informant who reported to the department of labor a suspected violation by the person of the employment security law, chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code, under an assurance of confidentiality. As used in this section and in chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code, “employment security information” means any information descriptive of an identifiable person or persons that is received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to or collected by the department of labor or the industrial commission in the administration of the employment security law.

Any personal records, other than names, business addresses and business phone numbers, such as parentage, race, religion, sex, height, weight, tax identification and social security numbers, financial worth or medical condition submitted to any public agency or independent public body corporate and politic pursuant to a statutory requirement for licensing, certification, permit or bonding.

Unless otherwise provided by agency rule, information obtained as part of an inquiry into a person’s fitness to be granted or retain a license, certificate, permit, privilege, commission or position, private association peer review committee records authorized in title 54, Idaho Code. Any agency that has records exempt from disclosure under the provisions of this subsection shall annually make available a statistical summary of the number and types of matters considered and their disposition.
(10) The records, findings, determinations and decisions of any prelitigation screening panel formed under chapters 10 and 23, title 6, Idaho Code.

Records containing personal financial, family, health or similar personal information submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA;

Records submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA with regard to obtaining and servicing mortgage loans and all records relating to the review, approval or rejection by the IHFA of said loans;

Mortgage portfolio loan documents;

Records of a current or former employee other than the employee’s duration of employment with the association, position held and location of employment. This exemption from disclosure does not include the contracts of employment or any remuneration, including reimbursement of expenses, of the executive director, executive officers or commissioners of the association. All other personnel information relating to an association employee or applicant including, but not limited to, information regarding sex, race, marital status, birth date, home address and telephone number, applications, testing and scoring materials, grievances, correspondence, retirement plan information and performance evaluations, shall not be disclosed to the public without the employee’s or applicant’s written consent. An employee or authorized representative may inspect and copy that employee’s personnel records, except for material used to screen and test for employment or material not subject to disclosure elsewhere in the Idaho public records act.
(21) Records of the department of health and welfare related to child support services in cases in which there is reasonable evidence of domestic violence, as defined in chapter 63, title 39, Idaho Code, that can be used to locate any individuals in the child support case except in response to a court order.

(11) Complaints received by the board of medicine and investigations and informal proceedings, including informal proceedings of any committee of the board of medicine, pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, and rules adopted thereunder.

(12) Records of the department of health and welfare or a public health district that identify a person infected with a reportable disease.

(13) Records of hospital care, medical records, including prescriptions, drug orders, records or any other prescription information that specifically identifies an individual patient, prescription records maintained by the board of pharmacy under sections 37-2726 and 37-2730A, Idaho Code, records of psychiatric care or treatment and professional counseling records relating to an individual’s condition, diagnosis, care or treatment, provided the provisions of this subsection making records exempt from disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or information contained in those records are necessary for a background check on an individual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of firearms, guns or ammunition.

(14) Information collected pursuant to the directory of new hires act, chapter 16, title 72, Idaho Code.

(15) Personal information contained in motor vehicle and driver records that is exempt from disclosure under the provisions of chapter 2, title 49, Idaho Code.

(16) Records of the financial status of prisoners pursuant to subsection (2) of section 20-607, Idaho Code.

(17) Records of the Idaho state police or department of correction received or maintained pursuant to section 19-5514, Idaho Code, relating to DNA databases and databanks.

(18) Records of the department of health and welfare relating to a survey, resurvey or complaint investigation of a licensed nursing facility shall be exempt from disclosure. Such records shall, however, be subject to disclosure as public records as soon as the facility in question has received the report, and no later than the fourteenth day following the date that department of health and welfare representatives officially exit the facility pursuant to federal regulations. Provided however, that for purposes of confidentiality, no record shall be released under this section that specifically identifies any nursing facility resident.

(19) Records and information contained in the registry of immunizations against childhood diseases maintained in the department of health and welfare, including information disseminated to others from the registry by the department of health and welfare.

(20) Records of the Idaho housing and finance association (IHFA) relating to the following:

(22) Records of the Idaho state bar lawyer assistance program pursuant to chapter 49, title 54, Idaho Code, unless a participant in the program authorizes the release pursuant to subsection (4) of section 54-4901, Idaho Code.

(23) Records and information contained in the time sensitive emergency registry created by chapter 20, title 57, Idaho Code, together with any reports, analyses and compilations created from such information and records.

(24) Records contained in the court files, or other records prepared as part of proceedings for judicial authorization of sterilization procedures pursuant to chapter 39, title 39, Idaho Code.

(25) The physical voter registration application on file in the county clerk’s office; however, a redacted copy of said application shall be made available consistent with the requirements of this section. Information from the voter registration application maintained in the statewide voter registration database, including age, will be made available except for the voter’s driver’s license number, date of birth and, upon a showing that the voter comes within the provisions of subsection (30) of this section or upon showing of good cause by the voter to the county clerk in consultation with the county prosecuting attorney, the physical residence address of the voter. For the purposes of this subsection, good cause shall include the protection of life and property and protection of victims of domestic violence and similar crimes.

(26) File numbers, passwords and information in the files of the health care directive registry maintained by the department of health and welfare under section 39-4515, Idaho Code, are confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person other than to the person who executed the health care directive or the revocation thereof and that person’s legal representatives, to the person who registered the health care directive or revocation thereof, and to physicians, hospitals, medical personnel, nursing homes, and other persons who have been granted file number and password access to the documents within that specific file.

(27) Records in an address confidentiality program participant’s file as provided for in chapter 57, title 19, Idaho Code, other than the address designated by the secretary of state, except under the following circumstances:

(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency; or

(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order.

(28) Except as otherwise provided by law relating to the release of information to a governmental entity or law enforcement agency, any personal information including, but not limited to, names, personal and business addresses and phone numbers, sex, height, weight, date of birth, social security and driver’s license numbers, or any other identifying numbers and/or information related to any Idaho fish and game licenses, permits and tags unless written consent is obtained from the affected person.
(29) Documents and records related to alternatives to discipline that are maintained by the Idaho board of veterinary medicine under the provisions of section 54-2118(1)(b), Idaho Code, provided the requirements set forth therein are met.

(30) The Idaho residential street address and telephone number of an eligible law enforcement officer and such officer’s residing household member(s) as provided for in chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, except under the following circumstances:

(a) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the court order;

(b) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency;

(c) If requested by a financial institution or title company for business purposes, to the requesting financial institution or title company; or

(d) If the law enforcement officer provides written permission for disclosure of such information.

(31) All information exchanged between the Idaho transportation department and insurance companies, any database created, all information contained in the verification system and all reports, responses or other information generated for the purposes of the verification system, pursuant to section 49-1234, Idaho Code.

(32) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of information to the state controller as the state social security administrator as provided in section 59-1101A, Idaho Code.

(33) Personal information including, but not limited to, property values, personal and business addresses, phone numbers, dates of birth, social security and driver’s license numbers or any other identifying numbers or information maintained by the administrator of the unclaimed property law set forth in chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the release of names, last known city of residence, property value ranges and general property information by the administrator for the purpose of reuniting unclaimed property with its owner.

(34) Any personal information collected by the secretary of state, pursuant to section 67-906(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the purpose of allowing individuals to access the statewide electronic filing system authorized in section 67-906, Idaho Code, and any notification e-mail addresses submitted as part of a lobbyist’s registration under section 67-6617, Idaho Code, of an employer, client, or designated contact for the purpose of electronic notification of that employer, client, or designated contact of a report filed under section 67-6619, Idaho Code.

§ 74-107. Records exempt from disclosure — Trade secrets, production records, appraisals, bids, proprietary information, tax commission, unclaimed property, petroleum clean water trust fund.

The following records are exempt from disclosure:

Trade secrets including those contained in response to public agency or independent public body corporate and politic requests for proposal, requests for clarification, requests for information and similar requests. “Trade secrets” as used in this section means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, computer program, device, method, technique, process, or unpublished or in-progress research that:

Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

Production records, housing production, rental and financing records, sale or purchase records, catch records, mortgage portfolio loan documents, or similar business records of a private concern or enterprise required by law to be submitted to or inspected by a public agency or submitted to or otherwise obtained by an independent public body corporate and politic. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use which can be made of such information for regulatory purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceeding.

Records relating to the appraisal of real property, timber or mineral rights prior to its acquisition, sale or lease by a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic.

Any estimate prepared by a public agency or independent public body corporate and politic that details the cost of a public project until such time as disclosed or bids are opened, or upon award of the contract for construction of the public project.

Examination, operating or condition reports and all documents relating thereto, prepared by or supplied to any public agency or independent public body corporate and politic responsible for the regulation or supervision of financial institutions including, but not limited to, banks, savings and loan associations, regulated lenders, business and industrial development corporations, credit unions, and insurance companies, or for the regulation or supervision of the issuance of securities.

Records gathered by a local agency or the Idaho department of commerce, as described in chapter 47, title 67, Idaho Code, for the specific purpose of assisting a person to locate, maintain, invest in, or expand business operations in the state of Idaho.

Shipping and marketing records of commodity commissions used to evaluate marketing and advertising strategies and the names and addresses of growers and shippers maintained by commodity commissions.

Financial statements and business information and reports submitted by a legal entity to a port district organized under title 70, Idaho Code, in connection with a business agreement, or with a development proposal or with a financing application for any industrial, manufacturing, or other business activity within a port district.

Names and addresses of seed companies, seed crop growers, seed crop consignees, locations of seed crop fields, variety name and acreage by variety. Upon the request of the owner of the proprietary variety, this information shall be released to the owner. Provided however, that if a seed crop has been identified as diseased or has been otherwise identified by the Idaho department of agriculture, other state departments of agriculture, or the United States department of agriculture to represent a threat to that particular seed or commercial crop industry or to individual growers, information as to test results, location, acreage involved and disease symptoms of that particular seed crop, for that growing season, shall be available for public inspection and copying. This exemption shall not supersede the provisions of section 22-436, Idaho Code, nor shall this exemption apply to information regarding specific property locations subject to an open burning of crop residue pursuant to section 39-114, Idaho Code, names of persons responsible for the open burn, acreage and crop type to be burned, and time frames for burning.
(10) Information obtained from books, records and accounts required in chapter 47, title 22, Idaho Code, to be maintained by the Idaho oilseed commission and pertaining to the individual production records of oilseed growers.

The original data including, but not limited to, numbers, text, voice, graphics and images;

Analysis, compilation and other manipulated forms of the original data produced by use of the program; or

The mathematical or statistical formulas that would be used if the manipulated forms of the original data were to be produced manually.
(16) Active investigative records and trademark usage audits of the Idaho potato commission specifically relating to the enforcement of chapter 12, title 22, Idaho Code, until the commencement of formal proceedings as provided by rules of the commission; purchase and sales information submitted to the Idaho potato commission during a trademark usage audit, and investigation or enforcement proceedings. Inactive investigatory records shall be disclosed unless the disclosure would violate the standards set forth in subsection (1)(a) through (f) of section 74-124, Idaho Code. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use which can be made, or availability of such information if used, for regulatory purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceeding.

Nothing in this subsection shall prevent disclosure of the following information:

Name and mailing address of the property owner;

A parcel number;

A legal description of real property;

The square footage and acreage of real property;

The assessed value of taxable property;

The tax district and the tax rate; and

The total property tax assessed.

(11) Records of any risk retention or self-insurance program prepared in anticipation of litigation or for analysis of or settlement of potential or actual money damage claims against a public entity and its employees or against the industrial special indemnity fund except as otherwise discoverable under the Idaho or federal rules of civil procedure. These records shall include, but are not limited to, claims evaluations, investigatory records, computerized reports of losses, case reserves, internal documents and correspondence relating thereto. At the time any claim is concluded, only statistical data and actual amounts paid in settlement shall be deemed a public record unless otherwise ordered to be sealed by a court of competent jurisdiction. Provided however, nothing in this subsection is intended to limit the attorney-client privilege or attorney work product privilege otherwise available to any public agency or independent public body corporate and politic.

(12) Records of laboratory test results provided by or retained by the Idaho food quality assurance laboratory. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use which can be made, or availability of such information if used, for regulatory purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceeding.

(13) Reports required to be filed under chapter 13, title 62, Idaho Code, identifying electrical or natural or manufactured gas consumption data for an individual customer or account.

(14) Voluntarily prepared environmental audits, and voluntary disclosures of information submitted on or before December 31, 1997, to an environmental agency, which are claimed to be confidential business information.

(15) Computer programs developed or purchased by or for any public agency or independent public body corporate and politic for its own use. As used in this subsection, “computer program” means a series of instructions or statements which permit the functioning of a computer system in a manner designed to provide storage, retrieval and manipulation of data from the computer system, and any associated documentation and source material that explain how to operate the computer program. Computer program does not include:

(17) All records copied or obtained by the director of the department of agriculture or his designee as a result of an inspection pursuant to section 25-3806, Idaho Code, except:

(a) Records otherwise deemed to be public records not exempt from disclosure pursuant to this chapter; and

(b) Inspection reports, determinations of compliance or noncompliance and all other records created by the director or his designee pursuant to section 25-3806, Idaho Code.

(18) All data and information collected by the division of animal industries or the state brand board pursuant to the provisions of section 25-207B, Idaho Code, or rules promulgated thereunder.

(19) Records disclosed to a county official by the state tax commission pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of section 63-3029B, Idaho Code.

(20) Records, data, information and materials collected, developed, generated, ascertained or discovered during the course of academic research at public institutions of higher education if the disclosure of such could reasonably affect the conduct or outcome of the research, or the ability of the public institution of higher education to patent or copyright the research or protect intellectual property.

(21) Records, data, information and materials collected or utilized during the course of academic research at public institutions of higher education provided by any person or entity other than the public institution of higher education or a public agency.

(22) The exemptions from disclosure provided in subsections (20) and (21) of this section shall apply only until the academic research is publicly released, copyrighted or patented, or until the academic research is completed or terminated. At such time, the records, data, information, and materials shall be subject to public disclosure unless: (a) another exemption in this chapter applies; (b) such information was provided to the institution subject to a written agreement of confidentiality; or (c) public disclosure would pose a danger to persons or property.

(23) The exemptions from disclosure provided in subsections (20) and (21) of this section do not include basic information about a particular research project that is otherwise subject to public disclosure, such as the nature of the academic research, the name of the researcher, and the amount and source of the funding provided for the project.

(24) Records of a county assessor, the state tax commission, a county board of equalization or the state board of tax appeals containing the following information: (i) lists of personal property required to be filed pursuant to section 63-302, Idaho Code, and operating statements required to be filed pursuant to section 63-404, Idaho Code; and (ii) confidential commercial or financial information including trade secrets. Except with respect to lists of personal property required to be filed pursuant to section 63-302, Idaho Code, and the operator statements required to be filed pursuant to section 63-404, Idaho Code, it shall be the responsibility of the taxpayer to give notice of its claim to exemption by stamping or marking each page or the first page of each portion of documents so claimed. No records that are exempt pursuant to this subsection shall be disclosed without the consent of the taxpayer except as follows:
(a) To any officer, employee or authorized representative of the state or the United States, under a continuing claim of confidentiality, as necessary to carry out the provisions of state or federal law or when relevant to any proceeding thereunder.

(b) In the publication of statistics or reports as long as the statistics or reports do not reasonably lead to the identification of the specific taxpayer or information submitted by taxpayers exempt pursuant to this subsection.

(c) To the board of tax appeals or the district court as evidence or otherwise in connection with an appeal of the taxpayer’s property tax assessment, but only if the board or the court, as applicable, has entered a protective order specifying that the taxpayer information may not be disclosed by any person conducting or participating in the action or proceeding, except as authorized by the board or the court in accordance with applicable law.

(25) Results of laboratory tests which have no known adverse impacts to human health conducted by the Idaho state department of agriculture animal health laboratory, related to diagnosis of animal diseases of individual animals or herds, on samples submitted by veterinarians or animal owners unless:

(a) The laboratory test results indicate the presence of a state or federally reportable or regulated disease in animals;

(b) The release of the test results is required by state or federal law; or

(c) The test result is identified as representing a threat to animal or human health or to the livestock industry by the Idaho state department of agriculture or the United States department of agriculture. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use which can be made, or availability of such information if used, for regulatory purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceeding, or the duty of any person to report contagious or infectious diseases as required by state or federal law.

(26) Results of laboratory tests conducted by the Idaho state department of agriculture seed laboratory on samples submitted by seed producers or seed companies. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use which can be made, or availability of such information pursuant to the provisions of subsections (9) and (10) of section 22-418, Idaho Code.

(27) For policies that are owned by private persons, and not by a public agency of the state of Idaho, records of policies, endorsements, affidavits and any records that discuss policies, endorsements and affidavits that may be required to be filed with or by a surplus line association pursuant to chapter 12, title 41, Idaho Code.

(28) Individual financial statements of a postsecondary educational institution or a proprietary school submitted to the state board of education, its director or a representative thereof, for the purpose of registering the postsecondary educational institution or proprietary school pursuant to section 33-2402 or 33-2403, Idaho Code, or provided pursuant to an administrative rule of the board adopted pursuant to such sections.
(29) Information submitted by insurance companies pursuant to section 41-612(17), Idaho Code.

(30) Documents, materials or other information submitted to the director of the department of insurance as provided in chapter 64, title 41, Idaho Code.

(31) Reports, information and other materials exempted by chapter 63, title 41, Idaho Code.

(32) Records that identify the method by which the Idaho state tax commission selects tax returns for audit review.

(33) Records that identify the method by which the administrator of the unclaimed property law set forth in chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code, selects reports for audit review or conducts audit review of such reports and the identity of individuals or entities under audit.

(34) Underwriting and claims records of the Idaho petroleum clean water trust fund obtained pursuant to section 41-4905, 41-4909, 41-4911A, 41-4912, or 41-4912A, Idaho Code. Provided, however, that this subsection shall not prevent the Idaho petroleum clean water trust fund’s submittal to the Idaho department of environmental quality or other regulatory agencies of information necessary to satisfy an insured’s corrective action requirement under applicable federal or state standards in the event of a release into the environment from a petroleum storage tank; and provided further that nothing in this subsection shall prevent the Idaho petroleum clean water trust fund from providing auditing, reporting, or actuarial information as otherwise required of it pursuant to section 41-4919, 41-4925A, 41-4928, 41-4930, 41-4932, 41-4937, or 41-4938, Idaho Code.

§ 74-108. Exemptions from disclosure — Archaeological, endangered species, libraries, licensing exams.

The following records are exempt from disclosure:

Records, maps or other records identifying the location of archaeological or geophysical sites or endangered species, if not already known to the general public.

Archaeological and geologic records concerning exploratory drilling, logging, mining and other excavation, when such records are required to be filed by statute for the time provided by statute.

Documents and data related to oil and gas production submitted to the department of lands or the oil and gas conservation commission under the provisions of chapter 3, title 47, Idaho Code, provided that the records qualify for confidential status under section 47-327, Idaho Code, under the conditions and for the time provided by statute.

The records of a library which, when examined alone, or when examined with other public records, would reveal the identity of the library patron checking out, requesting, or using an item from a library.

The material of a library, museum or archive that has been contributed by a private person, to the extent of any limitation that is a condition of the contribution.

Test questions, scoring keys, and other data used to administer a licensing examination, employment, academic or other examination or testing procedure before the examination is given if the examination is to be used again. Records establishing procedures for and instructing persons administering, grading or evaluating an examination or testing procedure are included in this exemption, to the extent that disclosure would create a risk that the result might be affected.

Land management plans required for voluntary stewardship agreements entered into pursuant to law and written agreements relating to the conservation of all species of sage grouse entered into voluntarily by owners or occupiers of land with a soil conservation district.

§ 74-109. Records exempt from disclosure — Draft legislation, research, personal communications, personally identifying information, work papers, and draft redistricting plans.

The following records are exempt from disclosure:

Records consisting of draft legislation and documents related to draft legislation, including requests for research or analysis submitted to the legislative services office by a member of the Idaho legislature and any documents related to such request.

Records consisting of personal communication by a member of the Idaho legislature or between members of the Idaho legislature that does not relate to the conduct or administration of the public’s business.

Personally identifying information relating to a private citizen contained in a writing to or from a member of the Idaho legislature. As used in this subsection, “private citizen” does not include a lobbyist registered with the office of the secretary of state, a public official, or an individual who is communicating on behalf of an organization. As used in this subsection, “public official” has the same meaning as in section 74-101(12), Idaho Code, except that it does not include elected or appointed members of the Idaho legislature and legislative staff.

Records consisting of or that are related to the work papers in the possession of the director of legislative performance evaluations prior to the release of the final performance evaluation.

Records consisting of or that are related to the work papers in the possession of the division of legislative audits prior to release of the related final audit.

Records consisting of draft congressional and legislative redistricting plans and documents specifically related to such draft redistricting plans or research requests submitted to the commission staff by a member of the commission for reapportionment for the purpose of placing such draft redistricting plan into form suitable for presentation to the full membership of the commission, unless the individual commission member having submitted or requested such plans or research agrees to waive the provisions of confidentiality provided by this subsection.

§ 74-110. Exemption from disclosure — Records of court proceedings regarding judicial authorization of abortion procedures for minors.

In accordance with section 18-609A, Idaho Code, the following records are exempt from public disclosure: all records contained in court files of judicial proceedings arising under section 18-609A, Idaho Code, are exempt from disclosure.

§ 74-111. Exemption from disclosure — Records related to the uniform securities act.

Except as otherwise determined by the director of the department of finance pursuant to section 30-14-607(c), Idaho Code, the following records are exempt from disclosure:

A record obtained or created by the director of the department of finance or a representative of the director in connection with an audit or inspection under section 30-14-411(d), Idaho Code, or an investigation under section 30-14-602, Idaho Code;

A part of a record filed in connection with a registration statement under section 30-14-301, Idaho Code, and sections 30-14-303 through 30-14-305, Idaho Code, or a record under section 30-14-411(d), Idaho Code, that contains trade secrets or confidential information if the person filing the registration statement or report has asserted a claim of confidentiality or privilege that is authorized by law;

A record that is not required to be provided to the director of the department of finance or filed under chapter 14, title 30, Idaho Code, and is provided to the director only on the condition that the record will not be subject to public examination or disclosure;

A nonpublic record received from a person specified in section 30-14-608(a), Idaho Code; and

Any social security number, residential address unless used as a business address, and residential telephone number unless used as a business telephone number, contained in a record that is filed pursuant to chapter 14, title 30, Idaho Code.

§ 74-112. Exempt and nonexempt public records to be separated.

If any public record contains material which is not exempt from disclosure as well as material which is exempt from disclosure, the public agency or independent public body corporate and politic shall, upon receipt of a request for disclosure, separate the exempt and nonexempt material and make the nonexempt material available for examination, provided that a denial of a request to copy nonexempt material in a public record shall not be based upon the fact that such nonexempt material is contained in the same public record as the exempt material.